Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet

148.522.
Organization of Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet.

The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall consist of the Office of the Secretary, the Office of Legal Affairs, the Office of Finance, the Office of Government Relations and Administration, the Office of Human Resources, the Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services, the Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage, the Kentucky Department of Tourism, the Kentucky Department of Parks, the Tourism Development Finance Authority, and such other divisions and sections as are from time to time deemed necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the cabinet subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 12.

The Office of Legal Affairs shall be headed by a general counsel appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 12.210, shall provide legal services for the cabinet, and shall be directly responsible to the secretary.

The Kentucky Department of Tourism shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor pursuant to the provisions of KRS 12.040. The commissioner shall have the authority and responsibility for the promotion, development, and support services for the tourism industry within the Commonwealth.

The Divisions of Tourism Services, Marketing and Administration, and Communications and Promotions are created within the Kentucky Department of Tourism. Each division shall be headed by a division director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the department pursuant to the provisions of KRS 12.050.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 404, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 13, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 159, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 424, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 48, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 1, § 10, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 95, § 17, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 152, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 18, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 65, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 69, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 156, § 23, effective June 29, 2021.

148.525.
Functions of divisions.

The Division of Tourism Services shall operate the highway welcome centers, conduct a hospitality education program for the tourism industry, coordinate the provision of mail and telephone information services to visitors, and generate sales revenue to the tourism industry of the Commonwealth through participation in trade shows and markets.

The Division of Marketing and Advertising shall be responsible for state tourism advertising, the state matching fund tourism advertising program, the development and maintenance of a marketing and research database on tourism, market survey programs, and special studies related to the tourism industry.

The commissioner of tourism may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with provisions of KRS Chapter 13A in order to carry out the provisions of KRS 148.522 and this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 424, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

148.527.
Kentucky Certified Retirement Community Program.

The Kentucky Department of Travel and Tourism of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall, after appropriate research has been conducted, establish and maintain a Kentucky Certified Retirement Community Program whereby retirees and those planning to retire are encouraged to make their homes in Kentucky communities that have met certain criteria to be certified by the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet as a Kentucky certified retirement community. In support of this program, the Kentucky Department of Travel and Tourism shall identify certain issues of interest to retirees or potential retirees in order to inform them of the benefits of living in Kentucky. Issues of interest to retirees may include but are not limited to:

Kentucky’s state and local tax structure;

Housing opportunities and cost;

Climate;

Personal safety;

Working opportunities;

Health care services and other services along the continuum of services, including but not limited to home and community based services;

Transportation;

Continuing education;

Leisure living;

Recreation;

The performing arts;

Festivals and events;

Sports at all levels; and

Other services and facilities that are necessary to enable persons to age in the community and in the least restrictive environment.

The mission of the Kentucky Certified Retirement Community Program shall be to:

Promote the state as a retirement destination to retirees and those persons and families who are planning retirement both in and outside of Kentucky;

Assist Kentucky communities in their efforts to market themselves as retirement locations and to develop communities that retirees would find attractive for a retirement lifestyle;

Assist in the development of retirement communities and lifecare communities for economic development purposes and as a means of providing a potential workforce and enriching Kentucky communities; and

Encourage tourism to Kentucky in the form of mature market travel to Kentucky in reference to retirement desirability for the future, and for the visitation of those who have chosen to retire in Kentucky.

The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall coordinate the development and planning of the Kentucky Certified Retirement Community Program with the Cabinet for Economic Development, the Department for Aging and Independent Living in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, and other state and local groups interested in participating in and promoting the program.

To obtain certification as a Kentucky certified retirement community, the following requirements shall be met:

Official community support. A resolution by the governing authority endorsing the local retirement recruitment effort is required;

Designation of a sponsor. The program shall have an official sponsoring organization that shall appoint an individual who will be accountable to the community and to the state;

Funding. The sponsoring organization must commit a minimum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per year for the local program;

Health services. There shall be a hospital and emergency medical services that are readily accessible to the community;

Available housing. The community shall maintain information on both resale housing and rental housing to ensure that the quantity is sufficient to meet the needs of potential new retiree residents;

Retiree desirability assessment. The community shall conduct a retiree desirability assessment that shall focus on a number of factors including, but not limited to, medical services, adult education opportunities, shopping, recreation, cultural opportunities, safety, aging services, and a continuum of care including home and community based services, housing for the elderly, assisted living, personal care, and nursing care facilities;

Establishment of subcommittees. Each locality shall have a general retiree attraction committee and a minimum of four (4) subcommittees as follows:

Community inventory/assessment subcommittee. This subcommittee shall conduct an unbiased inventory and assessment of whether the community can offer the basics that retirees demand and develop a professional portfolio containing brief biographies of professionals in the community;

Community relations/fundraising subcommittee. This subcommittee shall locate retirees living in the community, act as salespersons for the program, raise funds necessary to run the program, recruit subcommittee members, organize special events, and promote and coordinate the program with local entities;

Marketing and promotion subcommittee. This subcommittee shall establish a community image, evaluate target markets, develop and distribute promotional material, and coordinate advertising and public relations campaigns; and

Ambassadors subcommittee. This subcommittee shall be the first contact with prospective retirees and provide tour guides when prospects visit the community. The subcommittee shall respond to inquiries, log contacts made, provide tours, invite prospects to special community events, and maintain continual contact with prospects until the time that the prospect makes a retirement location decision;

Community profile. The sponsor shall develop a community profile similar to that used by many chambers of commerce. It will include factors such as crime statistics, tax information, recreational opportunities, and housing availability; and

Written marketing plan. The retiree attraction committee shall submit a marketing plan that shall detail the mission, the target market, the competition, an analysis of the community’s strengths, weaknesses, opportunities and threats, and the strategies the program will employ to attain its goals.

During the certification process, a representative of the retirement attraction committee shall attend state training meetings.

The retiree attraction committee shall work to gain the support of churches, clubs, businesses, and the local media, as this support is necessary for the success of the program.

Within ninety (90) days of certification, the locality shall submit a complete retiree attraction package to the Kentucky Department of Travel and Tourism.

Before certification is awarded, the retiree attraction committee shall submit a written three (3) year commitment to the program and a long-term plan outlining steps the community will undertake to maintain its desirability as a destination for retirees. The long-range plan shall outline plans to correct any facility and service deficiencies identified in the retiree desirability assessment required by subsection (4)(f) of this section. The written commitment and long-range plan shall be forwarded to the Kentucky Department of Travel and Tourism of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet.

Upon being certified as a Kentucky certified retirement community, the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall provide the following assistance to the community:

Assistance in the training of local staff and volunteers;

Ongoing oversight and guidance in marketing, plus updating on national retirement trends;

Inclusion in the state’s national advertising and public relations campaigns and travel show promotions, including a prominent feature on the cabinet’s Internet Web site;

Eligibility for state financial assistance for brochures, support material, and advertising; and

An annual evaluation and progress assessment on maintaining and improving the community’s desirability as a home for retirees.

The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 78, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 95, § 18, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 120, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 16, § 19, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 65, § 4, effective July 15, 2010.

148.530.
Functions of board. [Repealed.]

148.531.
[Renumbered as 154.29-010.]

148.532.
[Renumbered as 154.29-020.]

148.534.
[Renumbered as 154.29-030.]

148.536.
[Renumbered as 154.29-040.]

148.538.
[Renumbered as 154.29-050.]

148.539.
[Renumbered as 154.29-060.]

148.540.
Functions of department. [Repealed.]